Illinois, session 104th, HB5031.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Township Code is amended by adding Section 550-50 as follows: 6    (60 ILCS 1/50-50 new)7    Sec. 50-50. Write-in candidate limitations. Write-in 8candidates for township offices may not enter upon their 9duties if the number of votes the write-in candidates received 10in the election is less than the number of signatures on the 11petition the write-in candidates would have been required to 12obtain to appear on the ballot.13 1415    Section 10. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 16adding Section 3.1-10-80 as follows: 17    (65 ILCS 5/3.1-10-80 new)18    Sec. 3.1-10-80. Write-in candidate limitations. A write-in 19candidate for a municipal office may not assume the duties of 20the municipal office if the number of votes the write-in 21candidate received in the election is less than the number of   HB5031- 2 -LRB104 18549 RTM 31992 b1signatures on the petition the write-in candidate would have 2been required to obtain to appear on the ballot.